Utah statutes.
48-2a-1106.   Savings clause.

The repeal of any statutory provision by this chapter does not impair, or otherwise affect, the organization or the continued existence of a limited partnership existing on July 1, 1990, nor does the repeal of any existing statutory provision by this chapter impair any contract or affect any right accrued before July 1, 1990.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

